apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="le/ad__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ad</l>        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ad</l>        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ads</l>        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>d</l>        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ading</l>        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ading</l>        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ading</l>        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="le/ave__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ave</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ave</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aves</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ft</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ft</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aving</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aving</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>aving</l>        <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="l/ie¹__vblex">
      <e r="RL"><p>        <l>ie</l>        <r>ie:1<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p>        <l>ie</l>        <r>ie:1<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p>        <l>ies</l>        <r>ie:1<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p>        <l>ied</l>        <r>ie:1<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p>        <l>ied</l>        <r>ie:1<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>ie:1<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>ie:1<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>ie:1<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="l/ie__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ies</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ay</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ain</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ying</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="lo/se__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>se</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ses</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>st</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>st</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>sing</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>sing</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>sing</l>        <r>se<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="ma/ke__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>kes</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>de</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>de</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>king</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>king</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>king</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="me/et__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ets</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>t</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>t</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eting</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eting</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eting</l>        <r>et<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="m/elt__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>elt</l>        <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>elt</l>        <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>elts</l>        <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>elted</l>        <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>elted</l>        <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>olted</l>        <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>elting</l>        <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>elting</l>        <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>elting</l>        <r>elt<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="read__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ing</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="st/and__vblex">
      <e>      <p>        <l>and</l>        <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>and</l>        <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ands</l>        <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ood</l>        <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ood</l>        <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>anding</l>        <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>anding</l>        <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>anding</l>        <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="make noise"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>noise</l><r><g><b/>noise</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="make mistakes"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>mistakes</l><r><g><b/>mistakes</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="stand against"><i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/><p><l><b/>against</l><r><g><b/>against</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="withstand"><i>withst</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="leave out"><i>le</i><par n="le/ave__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="outspread"><i>outspread</i><par n="read__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="make a deal"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>deal</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>deal</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="lie"><i>l</i><par n="l/ie¹__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lie"><i>l</i><par n="l/ie__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lie ahead"><i>l</i><par n="l/ie__vblex"/><p><l><b/>ahead</l><r><g><b/>ahead</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="lead"><i>le</i><par n="le/ad__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="leave"><i>le</i><par n="le/ave__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lose"><i>lo</i><par n="lo/se__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="make"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="make a mistake"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>mistake</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>mistake</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="make do"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>do</l><r><g><b/>do</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="make possible"><i>ma</i><par n="ma/ke__vblex"/><p><l><b/>possible</l><r><g><b/>possible</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="meet"><i>me</i><par n="me/et__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reread"><i>reread</i><par n="read__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spread"><i>spread</i><par n="read__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spread about"><i>spread</i><par n="read__vblex"/><p><l><b/>about</l><r><g><b/>about</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="stand"><i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stand out"><i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="understand"><i>underst</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
